Hawaii statutes.
[§414-286] Articles of amendment. A
corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the
department director for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The text of each amendment adopted;

(3) If an amendment provides for an exchange,
reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares, a statement that provisions
necessary to effect the exchange, reclassification, or cancellation have been
made;

(4) The date of each amendment's adoption;

(5) If an amendment was adopted by the incorporators
or board of directors without shareholder action, a statement to that effect
and that shareholder action was not required; and

(6) If an amendment was approved by the shareholders:

(A) The designation, number of outstanding
shares, number of votes entitled to be cast by each voting group entitled to
vote separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each voting group
indisputably represented at the meeting; and

(B) Either the total number of votes cast for
and against the amendment by each voting group entitled to vote separately on
the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by
each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by
each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group. [L 2000, c
244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next